Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6836
Application; valid; when; director; Tax Commissioner; powers and duties.

(1) Any complete application shall be considered a valid application on the date submitted for the purposes of the ImagiNE Nebraska Act.

(2) The director shall be allowed access, by the Tax Commissioner, to information associated with the Nebraska Advantage Act, the Nebraska Advantage Rural Development Act, and the Employment and Investment Growth Act to meet the director's obligations under the ImagiNE Nebraska Act.

(3) The director may contract with the Tax Commissioner for services that the director determines are necessary to fulfill the director's responsibilities under the ImagiNE Nebraska Act, other than services which constitute the actual actions and decisions required to be taken or made by the director under the ImagiNE Nebraska Act.

(4) The Tax Commissioner shall develop and maintain an electronic application and reporting system to be used by the director and Tax Commissioner to administer the ImagiNE Nebraska Act.

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 36.

Employment and Investment Growth Act, see section 77-4101.

Nebraska Advantage Act, see section 77-5701.

Nebraska Advantage Rural Development Act, see section 77-27,187.